Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) $75,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $75,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for grants to the Minnesota Turf Seed Council for basic and applied research on: (1) the improved production of forage and turf seed related to new and improved varieties; and (2) native plants, including plant breeding, nutrient management, pest management, disease management, yield, and viability. The Minnesota Turf Seed Council may subcontract with a qualified third party to conduct some or all basic or applied research. Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available for the second year. new text end new text begin (b) The Minnesota Turf Seed Council must prepare a report outlining the use of grant money and related accomplishments. No later than January 15, 2027, the council must submit the report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over agriculture finance and policy. new text end